foma/verb/ThamizhiVerbs-C12.lexc
LEXICON CIru12Inf


%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ந்தேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ந்தோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ந்தன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ந்தாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ந்தீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ந்தீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ந்தான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ந்தாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ந்தர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ந்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ந்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgn%=அது:^ந்தது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3pln%=அன:^ந்தன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^க்கிறேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^க்கிறோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கிறன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^க்கிறாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^க்கிறீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^க்கிறீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^க்கிறான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^க்கிறாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^க்கிறர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^க்கிறது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3pln%=அன:^க்கிறன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^க்கின்றேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^க்கின்றோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கின்றன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^க்கின்றாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^க்கின்றீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^க்கின்றீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^க்கின்றான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^க்கின்றாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^க்கின்றர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^க்கின்றது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3pln%=அன:^க்கின்றன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ப்பேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ப்போம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ப்பாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ப்பீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ப்பீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ப்பான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ப்பாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ப்பர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=உம்%|+3sgn%=∅:^ும் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+fut%=உம்%|+3pln%=∅:^ும் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=(ந்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ந்தனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=(ந்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^ந்தனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+past%=(ந்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^ந்தனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கிறனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^க்கிறனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^க்கிறனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கின்றனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^க்கின்றனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^க்கின்றனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+imp%=∅%|+2sg%=∅:^ #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+imp%=∅%|+2pl%=உங்கள்:^ுங்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+euph%=ஏ:^ாதே #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ாதீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+euph%=ஏ:^ாதே #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ாதீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ப்பிந்தேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ப்பிந்தோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ப்பிந்தன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ப்பிந்தாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ப்பிந்தீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ப்பிந்தீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ப்பிந்தான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ப்பிந்தாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ப்பிந்தர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பிந்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பிந்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgn%=அது:^ப்பிந்தது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3pln%=அன:^ப்பிந்தன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ப்பிக்கிறேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ப்பிக்கிறோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ப்பிக்கிறன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ப்பிக்கிறாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ப்பிக்கிறீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ப்பிக்கிறீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ப்பிக்கிறான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ப்பிக்கிறாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ப்பிக்கிறர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பிக்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பிக்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^ப்பிக்கிறது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3pln%=அன:^ப்பிக்கிறன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ப்பிக்கின்றேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ப்பிக்கின்றோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+mood%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ப்பிக்கின்றன் #;

LEXICON ClassIru12
விதுவிதுத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
விங்களித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
வெளுத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
வசித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
திகைத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
துருதுருத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
தாரித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
தெறுத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
தூலித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
முண்டித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
மொலுமொலுத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
மூரலித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
குருத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
கம்பித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
கபளீத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
கோடீகரித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
பிரலாபித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
புணர்த்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
பராமரித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
பொடித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
போஷித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
நிரூபித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
நர்வலித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
நனைத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
சிரத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
சவதரித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
சதைத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
சண்ணித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
சப்பளித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
சங்கிரகித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
ஒருக்கணித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
எறித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
இலக்கித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
ஆலோசித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
உருத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
உடற்கரித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
அரணித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
அலங்கரித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
மிதந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
பரந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
மாண்டிரு      CIru12Inf; 
கஞன்றிரு      CIru12Inf; 
அனன்றிரு      CIru12Inf; 
கடைந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
முறிந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
துலைந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
தவழ்ந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
விளர்ந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
பிறழ்ந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
பொதிந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
ஒடிந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
நினைந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
இயைந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
அணர்ந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
குதறியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
கிடத்தியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
கலவியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
கெந்தியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
வறண்டியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
விரும்பியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
வாழ்த்தியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
புறாண்டியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
பம்பியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
பீறியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
பழக்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
பொருநியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
முரணியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
மிழற்றியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
மழுங்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
சுட்டியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
சிண்டியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
சாத்தியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
சொட்டியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
துளங்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
தவ்வியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
தடக்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
தன்னியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
ஞொள்ளியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
நகர்த்தியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
நசுக்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
நண்ணியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
நொறுக்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
ஒண்டியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
ஊம்பியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
உறுமியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
உலவியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
இறுக்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
இங்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
அயாவியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
அண்டியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
அரவியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
தட்டிரு      CIru12Inf; 
தின்றிரு      CIru12Inf; 
விவகரித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
விடாய்த்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
வாரித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
வந்தித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
தித்தித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
துளைத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
தரித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
தடைத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
மர்த்தித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
கவிழ்த்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
கைத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
பிரவர்த்தித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
பரிதபித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
பறித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
நழுநழுத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
நீளித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
சுவலித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
செரித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
சூசித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
இழித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
ஆசங்கித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
அழித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
அடுத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
உலந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
ஞரன்றிரு      CIru12Inf; 
கனிந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
துலைந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
விளிந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
பொலிந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
நிமிர்ந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
அளைந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
கிறாவியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
கெண்டியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
விங்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
வெளிறியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
பிதுங்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
பொள்ளியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
மேவியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
மூடியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
சீப்பியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
துவன்றியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
திணறியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
தோண்டியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
நிப்பாட்டு்ியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
நழுப்பியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
ஒழுங்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
உயாவியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
இயக்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
அசும்பியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
அத்தியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
